Utah statutes.
16-10a-1326.   Failure to take action.
(1)  If the effective date of the corporate action creating dissenters' rights
under Section 16-10a-1302 does not occur within 60 days after the date set by
the corporation as the date by which the corporation must receive payment
demands as provided in Section 16-10a-1322, the corporation shall return all
deposited certificates and release the transfer restrictions imposed on
uncertificated shares, and all shareholders who submitted a demand for payment
pursuant to Section 16-10a-1323 shall thereafter have all rights of a
shareholder as if no demand for payment had been made.
(2)  If the effective date of the corporate action creating dissenters' rights
under Section 16-10a-1302 occurs more than 60 days after the date set by the
corporation as the date by which the corporation must receive payment demands
as provided in Section 16-10a-1322, then the corporation shall send a new
dissenters' notice, as provided in Section 16-10a-1322, and the provisions of
Sections 16-10a-1323 through 16-10a-1328 shall again be applicable.
